Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.020

Civil jurisdiction.

If, for each claimant, the value of the claim or the amount at issue does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorneys' fees, the district court shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of the following civil actions and proceedings:

(1) Actions arising on contract for the recovery of money;

(2) Actions for damages for injuries to the person, or for taking or detaining personal property, or for injuring personal property, or for an injury to real property when no issue raised by the answer involves the plaintiff's title to or possession of the same and actions to recover the possession of personal property;

(3) Actions for a penalty;

(4) Actions upon a bond conditioned for the payment of money, when the amount claimed does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, though the penalty of the bond exceeds that sum, the judgment to be given for the sum actually due, not exceeding the amount claimed in the complaint;

(5) Actions on an undertaking or surety bond taken by the court;

(6) Actions for damages for fraud in the sale, purchase, or exchange of personal property;

(7) Proceedings to take and enter judgment on confession of a defendant;

(8) Proceedings to issue writs of attachment, garnishment and replevin upon goods, chattels, moneys, and effects;

(9) Actions arising under the provisions of chapter 19.190 RCW;

(10) Proceedings to civilly enforce any money judgment entered in any municipal court or municipal department of a district court organized under the laws of this state; and

(11) All other actions and proceedings of which jurisdiction is specially conferred by statute, when the title to, or right of possession of, real property is not involved.

[ 2015 c 260 s 1; 2008 c 227 s 1; 2007 c 46 s 1; 2003 c 27 s 1; 2000 c 49 s 1; 1997 c 246 s 1; 1991 c 33 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 41; 1981 c 331 s 7; 1979 c 102 s 3; 1965 c 95 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 113.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: See notes following RCW 3.50.003.

Effective date—1991 c 33: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991." [ 1991 c 33 s 7.]

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.

Application, savings—1979 c 102: "Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this 1979 amendatory act upon taking effect shall apply to all actions filed on or after December 8, 1977. Any party to an action which is pending on the effective date of this act shall be permitted to amend any pleadings to reflect such increase in court jurisdiction: PROVIDED, That nothing in this act shall affect the validity of judicial acts taken prior to its effective date." [ 1979 c 102 s 5.]

Severability—1979 c 102: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 102 s 6.]

Effective date—1979 c 102: "Sections 2 through 5 of this 1979 amendatory act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect May 1, 1979." [ 1979 c 102 s 7.]